North Carolina, session 2025, SB794.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

CREATION OF THE NORTH CAROLINA VICTIMS OF CRIME ASSISTANCE (NC
VOCA) ACT, FUND, AND COMPETITIVE GRANT PROGRAM
SECTION 1.(a) Chapter 15B of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
Article to read:
"Article 3.
"North Carolina Victims of Crime Assistance Act.
"§ 15B-50. Short title.
This Article may be cited as the "North Carolina Victims of Crime Assistance Act."
"§ 15B-51. Definitions.
As used in this Article, the following definitions apply, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) Assistance Fund. – The North Carolina Victims of Crime Assistance Fund.
(2) Commission. – The Governor's Crime Commission.
(3) Grant Program. – The North Carolina Victims of Crime Assistance
Competitive Grant Program.
(4) Victim. – A person who suffered physical, sexual, financial, or emotional
harm as a result of the commission of a crime.
(5) Victim assistance program. – A program operated by a public agency or
nonprofit organization that (i) provides services to victims of crime and (ii)
demonstrates a record of providing effective services to victims of crime.
"§ 15B-52. North Carolina Victims of Crime Assistance Fund.
(a) Fund Created. – The North Carolina Victims of Crime Assistance Fund is established
as a special fund within the Department of Public Safety. The Governor's Crime Commission is
responsible for administering the Assistance Fund using personnel and other administrative
resources of the Department of Public Safety.
(b) Fund Purpose. – The Assistance Fund shall be utilized to distribute grant funds
pursuant to the North Carolina Victims of Crime Assistance Grant Program created by this
Article.
(c) Fund Sources. – The Assistance Fund may receive any of the following:
(1) Funds appropriated by the General Assembly.
(2) Funds received pursuant to State law.
(3) Gifts, grants, or donations from any public or private sources.
*S794-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
"§ 15B-53. North Carolina Victims of Crime Assistance Competitive Grant Program.
(a) Grant Program. – There is established the North Carolina Victims of Crime
Assistance Competitive Grant Program to be administered by the Governor's Crime Commission
for the purpose of awarding and distributing grants to public or nonprofit organizations serving
residents of the State through victim assistance programs. The Grant Program shall be funded by
the North Carolina Victims of Crime Assistance Fund created by this Article.
(b) Grant Program Guidelines. – The Commission shall develop guidelines and
procedures for the administration of the Grant Program, including at a minimum the following
requirements and limitations:
(1) The maximum grant amount shall not exceed one million dollars
($1,000,000).
(2) The maximum total award amount to a grantee during a single fiscal year shall
not exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000). For purposes of this subdivision,
the total award amount shall only include funds awarded in the fiscal year in
question and shall not include funds awarded to that grantee during prior fiscal
years, regardless of whether all or part of those funds awarded during prior
fiscal years remain unspent.
(3) Each grantee shall operate one or more victim assistance programs serving
victims in the State in at least one of the following ways:
a. Responding to the emotional and physical needs of crime victims.
b. Assisting victims of crime in stabilizing their lives after a
victimization.
c. Helping victims understand and participate in the criminal justice
system.
d. Providing victims of crime with a measure of safety and security.
(4) Each grant applicant shall include in its application a detailed explanation of
how the applicant plans to use the grant funds, including at a minimum each
of the following:
a. A description of the geographic area the organization serves and the
needs of victims in that area.
b. A plan to address the needs of victims using the grant funds.
c. A description of the organization's capacity to implement its plan to
address the needs of victims, including the organization's staffing
level, systems, partnerships, existing funding, and existing programs.
(5) No later than one year after the receipt of grant funds pursuant to the Grant
Program, grantees shall report to the Governor's Crime Commission each of
the following:
a. Progress on the development and implementation of its plan as
delineated in its grant application.
b. A detailed explanation of the uses of the grant funds.
c. The number of victims assisted by the use of the grant funds.
d. The amount of grant funds remaining at the time of reporting.
e. Any additional information required by the Commission.
(c) Reporting. – No later than March 1 of each year, the Governor's Crime Commission
shall report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Justice and Public Safety regarding
the Grant Program, including at a minimum each of the following:
(1) The number, amount, and recipient of all grant funds awarded in the prior
calendar year.
(2) All information received pursuant to the grantee reports required by
subsection (b) of this section.
Page 2 Senate Bill 794-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(3) The current, unencumbered funds available within the North Carolina Victims
of Crime Assistance Fund.
(d) Disbursements. – If grant funds awarded under this section cannot be paid due to
insufficient funds in the Fund, payment shall be delayed until sufficient funds are available and
no further grant awards shall be made until sufficient funds are available."
SECTION 1.(b) This section is effective when it becomes law.

INCREASE CRIMINAL COURT COSTS TO SUPPORT THE NORTH CAROLINA
VICTIMS OF CRIME ASSISTANCE FUND
SECTION 2.(a) G.S. 7A-304(a) reads as rewritten:
"§ 7A-304. Costs in criminal actions.
(a) In every criminal case in the superior or district court, wherein the defendant is
convicted, or enters a plea of guilty or nolo contendere, or when costs are assessed against the
prosecuting witness, the following costs shall be assessed and collected. No costs may be
assessed when a case is dismissed. Only upon entry of a written order, supported by findings of
fact and conclusions of law, determining that there is just cause, the court may (i) waive costs
assessed under this section or (ii) waive or reduce costs assessed under subdivision (7), (8), (8a),
(11), (12), or (13) of this section. No court may waive or remit all or part of any court fines or
costs without providing notice and opportunity to be heard by all government entities directly
affected. The court shall provide notice to the government entities directly affected of (i) the date
and time of the hearing and (ii) the right to be heard and make an objection to the remission or
waiver of all or part of the order of court costs at least 15 days prior to hearing. Notice shall be
made to the government entities affected by first-class mail to the address provided for receipt of
court costs paid pursuant to the order. The costs referenced in this subsection are listed below:
…
(4) For support of the General Court of Justice, the sum of one hundred
forty-seven fifty-one dollars and fifty cents ($147.50) ($151.00) in the district
court, including cases before a magistrate, and the sum of one hundred
fifty-four fifty-eight dollars and fifty cents ($154.50) ($158.00) in the superior
court, to be remitted to the State Treasurer. For a person convicted of a felony
in superior court who has made a first appearance in district court, both the
district court and superior court fees shall be assessed. The State Treasurer
shall remit the sum of ninety-five cents ($.95) following sums of each fee
collected under this subdivision to the subdivision:
a. Three dollars and fifty cents ($3.50) to the North Carolina Victims of
Crime Assistance Fund.
b. Ninety-five cents (95¢) to the North Carolina State Bar for the
provision of services described in G.S. 7A-474.19.
…."
SECTION 2.(b) This section becomes effective December 1, 2026, and applies to
court costs assessed on or after that date.

INCREASE MARRIAGE LICENSE FEES TO SUPPORT THE NORTH CAROLINA
VICTIMS OF CRIME ASSISTANCE FUND
SECTION 3.(a) G.S. 161-10(a) reads as rewritten:
"§ 161-10. Uniform fees of registers of deeds.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this Article, all fees collected under this section shall
be deposited into the county general fund. While performing the duties of the office, the register
of deeds shall collect the following fees which shall be uniform throughout the State:
…
Senate Bill 794-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) Marriage Licenses. – For issuing a license sixty sixty-five dollars ($60.00);
($65.00), of which five dollars ($5.00) shall be credited to the North Carolina
Victims of Crime Assistance Fund; for issuing a delayed certificate with one
certified copy twenty dollars ($20.00); and for a proceeding for correction of
an application, license or certificate, with one certified copy ten dollars
($10.00).
…."
SECTION 3.(b) This section becomes effective December 1, 2026, and applies to
marriage licenses issued on or after that date.

EFFECTIVE DATE AND SEVERABILITY CLAUSE
SECTION 4.(a) Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
SECTION 4.(b) If any section or provision of this act is declared unconstitutional
or invalid by the courts, it does not affect the validity of this act as a whole or any part other than
the part declared to be unconstitutional or invalid.
Page 4 Senate Bill 794-First Edition